Utah statutes.
10-2-502.5.   Hearing on request for disconnection -- Determination by municipal legislative body -- Petition in district court.

(1)  Within 30 calendar days after the last publication of notice required under Subsection 10-2-501(3)(a), the legislative body of the municipality in which the area proposed for disconnection is located shall hold a public hearing.

(2)  At least seven calendar days before the hearing date, the municipal legislative body shall provide notice of the public hearing:

(a)  in writing to the petitioners and to the legislative body of the county in which the area proposed for disconnection is located; and

 	(b)  by publishing a notice:

(i) (A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality; or

(B)  if there is no newspaper as described in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A), then by posting notice of the hearing in at least three public places within the municipality; and

(ii)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.

(3)  In the public hearing, any person may speak and submit documents regarding the disconnection proposal.

(4)  Within 45 calendar days of the hearing, the municipal legislative body shall:

(a)  determine whether to grant the request for disconnection; and

(b)  if the municipality determines to grant the request, adopt an ordinance approving disconnection of the area from the municipality.

(5) (a)  A petition against the municipality challenging the municipal legislative body's determination under Subsection (4) may be filed in district court by:

(i)  petitioners; or

(ii)  the county in which the area proposed for disconnection is located.

(b)  Each petition under Subsection (5)(a) shall include a copy of the request for disconnection.

